Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 397 of Title 59, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This section shall modify the Oklahoma Administrative Code
Section 235:10-11-1 by the following provisions:
1. Penalties for vendor payments may only be imposed after a
formal court judgment;
2. Penalties may only be imposed on funeral establishments and
may not be imposed against the Funeral Director in Charge;

HB2922 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

3. These rules are only applicable to active funeral
establishments;
4. All funeral establishments must be in compliance with
federal bankruptcy laws; and
5. All cash payments made in advance must meet the requirements
of consumer fund receipts.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
03/10/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended.















HB2922 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.